nb: Tamburin-jinglemateriale: Aluminium; Messing; Bronse; Nysølv; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Sinklegering; Annet
th: เนื้อหาเพลงจิงเกิลสำหรับแทมบูรีน: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; บรอนซ์; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; สเตนเลสสตีล; เหล็ก; ซิงค์อัลลอย; อื่นๆ
es: Material para sonajas de la pandereta: Aluminio; Latón; Bronce; Plata niquelada; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Aleación de zinc; Otro
ru: Материал джинглов тамбурина: Алюминий; Латунь; Бронза; Нейзильбер; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Цинковый сплав; Другое
bg-BG: Материал на чинелчетата на тамбурина: Алуминий; Месинг; Бронз; Никелово сребро; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Цинкова сплав; Друго
fi: Tamburiinin helistinmateriaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Pronssi; Uushopea; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Sinkkiseos; Muu
tr: Tef zil malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Bronz; Nikel gümüş; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Çinko alaşımı; Diğer
pt-PT: Material das soalhas da pandeireta: Alumínio; Latão; Bronze; Prata niquelada; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Liga de zinco; Outro
nl: Tamboerijn schellenmateriaal: Aluminium; Messing; Brons; Nieuwzilver; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Zinklegering; Overig
cs: Materiál činelek na tamburíně: Hliník; Mosaz; Bronz; Alpaka; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Slitina zinku; Jiné
hu: Csörgődob csörgőinek anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Bronz; Újezüst; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Cinkötvözet; Egyéb
sl-SI: Material kraguljčkov tamburina: Aluminij; Medenina; Bron; Novo srebro; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Cinkova zlitina; Drugo
vi: Chất liệu chuông trống lắc tay: Nhôm; Đồng thau; Đồng thanh; Bạc niken; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Hợp kim kẽm; Khác
el: Υλικό για κουδούνισμα ντέφι: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Μπρούντζος; Αλπακάς; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Ατσάλι; Κράμα ψευδαργύρου; Άλλο
hr-HR: Materijal za tamburin jingle: Aluminij; Mjed; Bronca; Novo srebro; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Legura cinka; Ostalo
zh-CN: 铃鼓钹片材质: 铝; 黄铜; 青铜; 白铜; 不锈钢; 钢; 锌合金; 其他
ro-RO: Materialul zurgălăilor tamburinei: Aluminiu; Alamă; Bronz; Alpaca; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Aliaj de zinc; Altele
pl: Materiał blaszek tamburynu: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Brąz; Nowe srebro; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Stop cynku; Inny
sv: Material för tamburinens bjällror: Aluminium; Mässing; Brons; Nysilver; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Zinklegering; Annat
ko: 탬버린 징글 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 청동; 양백; 스테인리스 스틸; 스틸; 아연 합금; 기타
da: Jinglemateriale for tamburin: Aluminium; Messing; Bronze; Nysølv; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Zinklegering; Andet
ja: タンバリンジングル素材: アルミニウム; 真鍮; ブロンズ; 洋白; ステンレススチール; スチール; 亜鉛合金; その他
it: Materiale dei sonagli del tamburello: Alluminio; Ottone; Bronzo; Alpacca; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Lega di zinco; Altro
fr: Matériau des cymbalettes du tambourin: Aluminium; Laiton; Bronze; Maillechort; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Alliage de zinc; Autre
de: Material der Tamburin-Schellen: Aluminium; Messing; Bronze; Neusilber; Edelstahl; Stahl; Zinklegierung; Sonstige
pt-BR: Pandeiro material das platinelas: Alumínio; Latão; Bronze; Níquel-prata; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Liga de zinco; Outro
lt-LT: Tambūrino žvangučių medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Bronza; Melchioras; Nerūdijantis plienas; Plienas; Cinko lydinys; Kita
zh-TW: 鈴鼓銅鈸材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 青銅; 白銅; 不鏽鋼; 鋼; 鋅合金; 其他
sk-SK: Materiál zvonkohier na tamburíne: Hliník; Mosadz; Bronz; Alpaka (niklové striebro); Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Zliatina zinku; Iné
en: Tambourine jingle material: Aluminum; Brass; Bronze; Nickel silver; Stainless steel; Steel; Zinc alloy; Other